Hunspell/hy-AM.aff
FLAG num
SFX 403 Y 6
SFX 403	  ել	ե	ել		-ել+ե
SFX 403	  եմ	ե	եմ	-եմ+ե
SFX 403	  իլ	ի	իլ		-իլ+ի
SFX 403	  իմ	ի	իմ	-իմ+ի
SFX 403	  ալ	ա	ալ	-ալ+ա
SFX 403	  ուլ	ու	ուլ	-ուլ+ու

SFX 404 Y 6
SFX 404	  ել	ի	ել		-ել+ի
SFX 404	  եմ	ի	եմ	-եմ+ի
SFX 404	  իլ	ի	իլ		-իլ+ի
SFX 404	  իմ	ի	իմ	-իմ+ի
SFX 404	  ալ	ա	ալ	-ալ+ա
SFX 404	  ուլ	ու	ուլ	-ուլ+ու

SFX 405 Y 2
SFX 405	  լ	նք	լ	-լ+նք
SFX 405	  մ	նք	մ	-մ+նք

SFX 406 Y 6
SFX 406	  ել	եք	ել		-ել+եք
SFX 406	  եմ	եք	եմ	-եմ+եք
SFX 406	  իլ	իք	իլ		-իլ+իք
SFX 406	  իմ	իք	իմ	-իմ+իք
SFX 406	  ալ	աք	ալ	-ալ+աք
SFX 406	  ուլ	ուք	ուլ	-ուլ+ուք

SFX 407 Y 2
SFX 407	  լ	ն	լ	-լ+ն
SFX 407	  մ	ն	մ	-մ+ն

SFX 408 Y 6
SFX 408	  ել	եի	ել		-ել+եի
SFX 408	  եմ	եի	եմ	-եմ+եի
SFX 408	  իլ	եի	իլ		-իլ+եի
SFX 408	  իմ	եի	իմ	-իմ+եի
SFX 408	  ալ	այի	ալ	-ալ+այի
SFX 408	  ուլ	վի	ուլ	-ուլ+վի

SFX 409 Y 6
SFX 409	  ել	եիր	ել			-ել+եիր
SFX 409	  եմ	եիր	եմ		-եմ+եիր
SFX 409	  իլ	եիր	իլ			-իլ+եիր
SFX 409	  իմ	եիր	իմ		-իմ+եիր
SFX 409	  ալ	այիր	ալ	-ալ+այիր
SFX 409	  ուլ	վիր	ուլ		-ուլ+վիր

SFX 410 Y 6
SFX 410	  ել	եր	ել		-ել+եր
SFX 410	  եմ	եր	եմ	-եմ+եր
SFX 410	  իլ	եր	իլ		-իլ+եր
SFX 410	  իմ	եր	իմ	-իմ+եր
SFX 410	  ալ	ար	ալ	-ալ+ար
SFX 410	  ուլ	ուր	ուլ	-ուլ+ուր

SFX 411 Y 6
SFX 411	  ել	եինք	ել			-ել+եինք
SFX 411	  եմ	եինք	եմ		-եմ+եինք
SFX 411	  իլ	եինք	իլ			-իլ+եինք
SFX 411	  իմ	եինք	իմ		-իմ+եինք
SFX 411	  ալ	այինք	ալ	-ալ+այինք
SFX 411	  ուլ	վինք	ուլ		-ուլ+վինք

SFX 412 Y 6
SFX 412	  ել	եիք	ել		-ել+եիք
SFX 412	  եմ	եիք	եմ	-եմ+եիք
SFX 412	  իլ	եիք	իլ		-իլ+եիք
SFX 412	  իմ	եիք	իմ	-իմ+եիք
SFX 412	  ալ	այիք	ալ	-ալ+այիք
SFX 412	  ուլ	վիք	ուլ	-ուլ+վիք

SFX 413 Y 6
SFX 413	  ել	եին	ել			-ել+եին
SFX 413	  եմ	եին	եմ		-եմ+եին
SFX 413	  իլ	եին	իլ			-իլ+եին
SFX 413	  իմ	եին	իմ		-իմ+եին
SFX 413	  ալ	ային	ալ	-ալ+ային
SFX 413	  ուլ	վին	ուլ		-ուլ+վին

SFX 414 Y 4
SFX 414	  ել	եր	ել		-ել+եր
SFX 414	  իլ	իր	իլ		-իլ+իր
SFX 414	  ալ	ար	ալ	-ալ+ար
SFX 414	  ուլ	ուր	ուլ	-ուլ+ուր

SFX 415 Y 4
SFX 415	  ել	եք	ել		-ել+եք
SFX 415	  իլ	իք	իլ		-իլ+իք
SFX 415	  ալ	աք	ալ	-ալ+աք
SFX 415	  ուլ	ուք	ուլ	-ուլ+ուք

SFX 420 Y 1
SFX 420	  0	ի	.	+ի

SFX 421 Y 1
SFX 421	  0	իր	.	+իր

SFX 422 Y 1
SFX 422	  0	ր	.	+ր

SFX 423 Y 1
SFX 423	  0	ինք	.	+ինք

SFX 424 Y 1
SFX 424	  0	իք	.	+իք

SFX 425 Y 1
SFX 425	  0	ին	.	+ին

SFX 430 Y 4
SFX 430	  ել	եցի	ել		-ել+եցի
SFX 430	  իլ	եցի	իլ		-իլ+եցի
SFX 430	  ալ	ացի	ալ	-ալ+ացի
SFX 430	  ուլ	ուցի	ուլ	-ուլ+ուցի

SFX 431 Y 4
SFX 431	  ել	եցիր	ել			-ել+եցիր
SFX 431	  իլ	եցիր	իլ			-իլ+եցիր
SFX 431	  ալ	ացիր	ալ	-ալ+ացիր
SFX 431	  ուլ	ուցիր	ուլ	-ուլ+ուցիր

SFX 432 Y 4
SFX 432	  ել	եց	ել		-ել+եց
SFX 432	  իլ	եց	իլ		-իլ+եց
SFX 432	  ալ	աց	ալ	-ալ+աց
SFX 432	  ուլ	ուց	ուլ	-ուլ+ուց

SFX 433 Y 4
SFX 433	  ել	եցինք	ել		-ել+եցինք
SFX 433	  իլ	եցինք	իլ		-իլ+եցինք
SFX 433	  ալ	ացինք	ալ	-ալ+ացինք
SFX 433	  ուլ	ուցինք	ուլ	-ուլ+ուցինք

SFX 434 Y 4
SFX 434	  ել	եցիք	ել			-ել+եցիք
SFX 434	  իլ	եցիք	իլ			-իլ+եցիք
SFX 434	  ալ	ացիք	ալ	-ալ+ացիք
SFX 434	  ուլ	ուցիք	ուլ	-ուլ+ուցիք

SFX 435 Y 4
SFX 435	  ել	եցին	ել			-ել+եցին
SFX 435	  իլ	եցին	իլ			-իլ+եցին
SFX 435	  ալ	ացին	ալ	-ալ+ացին
SFX 435	  ուլ	ուցին	ուլ	-ուլ+ուցին

SFX 440 Y 6
SFX 440	  նել	ա	նել	-նել+ա
SFX 440	  նիլ	ա	նիլ	-նիլ+ա
SFX 440	  նալ	ա	նալ	-նալ+ա
SFX 440	  չել	ա	չել	-չել+ա
SFX 440	  չիլ	ա	չիլ	-չիլ+ա
SFX 440	  նուլ	ա	նուլ	-նուլ+ա

SFX 441 Y 6
SFX 441	  նել	ար	նել	-նել+ար
SFX 441	  նիլ	ար	նիլ	-նիլ+ար
SFX 441	  նալ	ար	նալ	-նալ+ար
SFX 441	  չել	ար	չել	-չել+ար
SFX 441	  չիլ	ար	չիլ	-չիլ+ար
SFX 441	  նուլ	ար	նուլ	-նուլ+ար

SFX 442 Y 6
SFX 442	  նել	ավ	նել	-նել+ավ
SFX 442	  նիլ	ավ	նիլ	-նիլ+ավ
SFX 442	  նալ	ավ	նալ	-նալ+ավ
SFX 442	  չել	ավ	չել	-չել+ավ
SFX 442	  չիլ	ավ	չիլ	-չիլ+ավ
SFX 442	  նուլ	ավ	նուլ	-նուլ+ավ

SFX 443 Y 6
SFX 443	  նել	անք	նել	-նել+անք
SFX 443	  նիլ	անք	նիլ	-նիլ+անք
SFX 443	  նալ	անք	նալ	-նալ+անք
SFX 443	  չել	անք	չել	-չել+անք
SFX 443	  չիլ	անք	չիլ	-չիլ+անք
SFX 443	  նուլ	անք	նուլ	-նուլ+անք

SFX 444 Y 6
SFX 444	  նել	աք	նել	-նել+աք
SFX 444	  նիլ	աք	նիլ	-նիլ+աք
SFX 444	  նալ	աք	նալ	-նալ+աք
SFX 444	  չել	աք	չել	-չել+աք
SFX 444	  չիլ	աք	չիլ	-չիլ+աք
SFX 444	  նուլ	աք	նուլ	-նուլ+աք

SFX 445 Y 6
SFX 445	  նել	ան	նել	-նել+ան
SFX 445	  նիլ	ան	նիլ	-նիլ+ան
SFX 445	  նալ	ան	նալ	-նալ+ան
SFX 445	  չել	ան	չել	-չել+ան
SFX 445	  չիլ	ան	չիլ	-չիլ+ան
SFX 445	  նուլ	ան	նուլ	-նուլ+ան

SFX 450 Y 3
SFX 450	  նալ	ցա	ենալ		-նալ+ցա
SFX 450	  նալ	ցա	անալ		-նալ+ցա
SFX 450	  նալ	ցա	[^եա]նալ	-նալ+ցա

SFX 451 Y 3
SFX 451	  նալ	ցար	ենալ		-նալ+ցար
SFX 451	  նալ	ցար	անալ		-նալ+ցար
SFX 451	  նալ	ցար	[^եա]նալ	-նալ+ցար

SFX 452 Y 3
SFX 452	  նալ	ցավ	ենալ		-նալ+ցավ
SFX 452	  նալ	ցավ	անալ		-նալ+ցավ
SFX 452	  նալ	ցավ	[^եա]նալ	-նալ+ցավ

SFX 453 Y 3
SFX 453	  նալ	ցանք	ենալ		-նալ+ցանք
SFX 453	  նալ	ցանք	անալ		-նալ+ցանք
SFX 453	  նալ	ցանք	[^եա]նալ	-նալ+ցանք

SFX 454 Y 3
SFX 454	  նալ	ցաք	ենալ		-նալ+ցաք
SFX 454	  նալ	ցաք	անալ		-նալ+ցաք
SFX 454	  նալ	ցաք	[^եա]նալ	-նալ+ցաք

SFX 455 Y 3
SFX 455	  նալ	ցան	ենալ		-նալ+ցան
SFX 455	  նալ	ցան	անալ		-նալ+ցան
SFX 455	  նալ	ցան	[^եա]նալ	-նալ+ցան

SFX 460 Y 1
SFX 460	  նել	րի	[ցձ]նել	-նել+րի

SFX 461 Y 1
SFX 461	  նել	րիր	[ցձ]նել	-նել+րիր

SFX 462 Y 1
SFX 462	  նել	րեց	[ցձ]նել	-նել+րեց

SFX 463 Y 1
SFX 463	  նել	րինք	[ցձ]նել	-նել+րինք

SFX 464 Y 1
SFX 464	  նել	րիք	[ցձ]նել	-նել+րիք

SFX 465 Y 1
SFX 465	  նել	րին	[ցձ]նել	-նել+րին

SFX 470 Y 3
SFX 470	  նել	ուցի	[ցձ]նել	-նել+ուցի
SFX 470	  ընել	ուցի	ընել		-ընել+ուցի
SFX 470	  անել	ի	ուցանել	-անել+ի

SFX 471 Y 3
SFX 471	  նել	ուցիր	[ցձ]նել	-նել+ուցիր
SFX 471	  ընել	ուցիր	ընել		-ընել+ուցիր
SFX 471	  անել	իր	ուցանել		-անել+իր

SFX 472 Y 3
SFX 472	  նել	ուց	[ցձ]նել	-նել+ուց
SFX 472	  ընել	ուց	ընել		-ընել+ուց
SFX 472	  ցանել	ց	ուցանել	-ցանել+ց

SFX 473 Y 3
SFX 473	  նել	ուցինք	[ցձ]նել	-նել+ուցինք
SFX 473	  ընել	ուցինք	ընել		-ընել+ուցինք
SFX 473	  անել	ինք	ուցանել		-անել+ինք

SFX 474 Y 3
SFX 474	  նել	ուցիք	[ցձ]նել	-նել+ուցիք
SFX 474	  ընել	ուցիք	ընել		-ընել+ուցիք
SFX 474	  անել	իք	ուցանել		-անել+իք

SFX 475 Y 3
SFX 475	  նել	ուցին	[ցձ]նել	-նել+ուցին
SFX 475	  ընել	ուցին	ընել		-ընել+ուցին
SFX 475	  անել	ին	ուցանել		-անել+ին

SFX 479 Y 1
SFX 479	  լ	ցիր	անալ	-լ+ցիր

SFX 480 Y 6
SFX 480	  նել	իր	նել	-նել+իր
SFX 480	  նիլ	իր	նիլ	-նիլ+իր
SFX 480	  նալ	իր	նալ	-նալ+իր
SFX 480	  չել	իր	չել	-չել+իր
SFX 480	  չիլ	իր	չիլ	-չիլ+իր
SFX 480	  նուլ	իր	նուլ	-նուլ+իր

SFX 481 Y 3
SFX 481	  ել	իր	ել		-ել+իր
SFX 481	  իլ	իր	իլ		-իլ+իր
SFX 481	  ալ	ա	ալ	-ալ+ա

SFX 482 Y 5
SFX 482	  նալ	ցիր	ենալ		-նալ+ցիր
SFX 482	  նալ	ցիր	անալ		-նալ+ցիր
SFX 482	  նալ	ցիր	[^եա]նալ	-նալ+ցիր
SFX 482	  նել	րու	[ցձ]նել		-նել+րու
SFX 482	  նուլ	վիր	նուլ			-նուլ+վիր

SFX 483 Y 3
SFX 483	  ել	ե	ել		-ել+ե
SFX 483	  իլ	ե	իլ		-իլ+ե
SFX 483	  ալ	ա	ալ	-ալ+ա

SFX 484 Y 5
SFX 484	  նալ	ցիր	ենալ		-նալ+ցիր
SFX 484	  նալ	ցիր	անալ		-նալ+ցիր
SFX 484	  նալ	ցիր	[^եա]նալ	-նալ+ցիր
SFX 484	  նել	ուր	[ցձ]նել		-նել+ուր
SFX 484	  ընել	ուր	ընել			-ընել+ուր

SFX 485 Y 7
SFX 485	  նել	եք	նել	-նել+եք
SFX 485	  նիլ	եք	նիլ	-նիլ+եք
SFX 485	  նալ	եք	նալ	-նալ+եք
SFX 485	  չել	եք	չել	-չել+եք
SFX 485	  չիլ	եք	չիլ	-չիլ+եք
SFX 485	  նուլ	եք	նուլ	-նուլ+եք
SFX 485	  ել	եք	[^նչ]ել	-ել+եք

SFX 486 Y 3
SFX 486	  ել	եցեք	ել			-ել+եցեք
SFX 486	  իլ	եցեք	իլ			-իլ+եցեք
SFX 486	  ալ	ացեք	ալ	-ալ+ացեք

SFX 487 Y 4
SFX 487	  նալ	ցեք	ենալ		-նալ+ցեք
SFX 487	  նալ	ցեք	անալ		-նալ+ցեք
SFX 487	  նալ	ցեք	[^եա]նալ	-նալ+ցեք
SFX 487	  նել	րեք	[ցձ]նել		-նել+րեք

SFX 488 Y 3
SFX 488	  նել	ուցեք	[ցձ]նել	-նել+ուցեք
SFX 488	  ընել	ուցեք	ընել		-ընել+ուցեք
SFX 488	  ել	ացեք	սել			-ել+ացեք

SFX 490 Y 11
SFX 490	  ել	եր	[^ցձ]նել			-ել+եր
SFX 490	  իլ	եր	նիլ				-իլ+եր
SFX 490	  նալ	եր	[^եա]նալ	-նալ+եր
SFX 490	  չել	եր	չել			-չել+եր
SFX 490	  չիլ	եր	չիլ			-չիլ+եր
SFX 490	  նալ	ցեր	ենալ		-նալ+ցեր
SFX 490	  նալ	ցեր	անալ		-նալ+ցեր
SFX 490	  նել	րեր	[ցձ]նել		-նել+րեր
SFX 490	  ել	եր	[^չն]ել			-ել+եր
SFX 490	  իլ	եր	[^չն]իլ			-իլ+եր
SFX 490	  ալ	ացեր	[^ն]ալ	-ալ+ացեր

SFX 491 Y 5
SFX 491	  նել	ուցեր	[ցձ]նել	-նել+ուցեր
SFX 491	  ընել	ուցեր	ընել		-ընել+ուցեր
SFX 491	  անել	եր	ուցանել		-անել+եր
SFX 491	  ել	եր	չել				-ել+եր
SFX 491	  ալ	ացեր	ալ		-ալ+ացեր

SFX 492 Y 2
SFX 492	  նալ	ցեր	նալ	-նալ+ցեր
SFX 492	  նել	եր	նել	-նել+եր

SFX 493 Y 2
SFX 493	  ալ	ացեր	ալ	-ալ+ացեր
SFX 493	  ել	եր	ել			-ել+եր

SFX 500 Y 11
SFX 500	  ել	ած	[^ցձ]նել			-ել+ած
SFX 500	  իլ	ած	նիլ				-իլ+ած
SFX 500	  նալ	ած	[^եա]նալ	-նալ+ած
SFX 500	  չել	ած	չել			-չել+ած
SFX 500	  չիլ	ած	չիլ			-չիլ+ած
SFX 500	  նալ	ցած	ենալ		-նալ+ցած
SFX 500	  նալ	ցած	անալ		-նալ+ցած
SFX 500	  նել	րած	[ցձ]նել		-նել+րած
SFX 500	  ել	ած	[^չն]ել			-ել+ած
SFX 500	  իլ	ած	[^չն]իլ			-իլ+ած
SFX 500	  ալ	ացած	[^ն]ալ	-ալ+ացած

SFX 501 Y 5
SFX 501	  նել	ուցած	[ցձ]նել	-նել+ուցած
SFX 501	  ընել	ուցած	ընել		-ընել+ուցած
SFX 501	  անել	ած	ուցանել		-անել+ած
SFX 501	  ել	ած	չել				-ել+ած
SFX 501	  ալ	ացած	ալ		-ալ+ացած

SFX 502 Y 4
SFX 502	  նալ	ցած	նալ		-նալ+ցած
SFX 502	  նել	ած	նել		-նել+ած
SFX 502	  նիլ	ած	նիլ		-նիլ+ած
SFX 502	  նուլ	ած	նուլ		-նուլ+ած

SFX 503 Y 1
SFX 503	  ել	ած	ել	-ել+ած

SFX 510 Y 7
SFX 510	  ել	ող	ել					-ել+ող
SFX 510	  իլ	ող	իլ					-իլ+ող
SFX 510	  նալ	ցող	ենալ			-նալ+ցող
SFX 510	  նալ	ցող	անալ			-նալ+ցող
SFX 510	  ալ	ացող	[^եա]նալ	-ալ+ացող
SFX 510	  ալ	ացող	[^ն]ալ		-ալ+ացող
SFX 510	  ուլ	ուցող	ուլ			-ուլ+ուցող

SFX 511 Y 2
SFX 511	  նալ	ցող	նալ	-նալ+ցող
SFX 511	  ուլ	ող	ուլ	-ուլ+ող

SFX 519 Y 3
SFX 519	  վել	վում	վել	-վել+վում
SFX 519	  վիլ	վում	վիլ	-վիլ+վում
SFX 519	  վալ	վում	վալ	-վալ+վում

SFX 520 Y 4
SFX 520	  ել	ում	ել		-ել+ում
SFX 520	  իլ	ում	իլ		-իլ+ում
SFX 520	  ալ	ում	ալ	-ալ+ում
SFX 520	  ուլ	ում	ուլ	-ուլ+ում

SFX 521 Y 11
SFX 521	  ել	ել	[^ցձ]նել			-ել+ել
SFX 521	  իլ	ել	նիլ				-իլ+ել
SFX 521	  նալ	ել	[^եա]նալ	-նալ+ել
SFX 521	  չել	ել	չել			-չել+ել
SFX 521	  չիլ	ել	չիլ			-չիլ+ել
SFX 521	  նալ	ցել	ենալ		-նալ+ցել
SFX 521	  նալ	ցել	անալ		-նալ+ցել
SFX 521	  նել	րել	[ցձ]նել		-նել+րել
SFX 521	  ել	ել	[^չն]ել			-ել+ել
SFX 521	  իլ	ել	[^չն]իլ			-իլ+ել
SFX 521	  ալ	ացել	[^ն]ալ	-ալ+ացել

SFX 522 Y 5
SFX 522	  նել	ուցել	[ցձ]նել	-նել+ուցել
SFX 522	  ընել	ուցել	ընել		-ընել+ուցել
SFX 522	  անել	ել	ուցանել		-անել+ել
SFX 522	  ել	ել	չել				-ել+ել
SFX 522	  ալ	ացել	ալ		-ալ+ացել

SFX 523 Y 3
SFX 523	  նալ	ցել	նալ	-նալ+ցել
SFX 523	  նել	ել	նել	-նել+ել
SFX 523	  նիլ	ել	նիլ	-նիլ+ել

SFX 600 Y 11
SFX 600	  ել	ած/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	[^ցձ]նել			-ել+ած
SFX 600	  իլ	ած/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	նիլ				-իլ+ած
SFX 600	  նալ	ած/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	[^եա]նալ	-նալ+ած
SFX 600	  չել	ած/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	չել			-չել+ած
SFX 600	  չիլ	ած/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	չիլ			-չիլ+ած
SFX 600	  նալ	ցած/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	ենալ	-նալ+ցած
SFX 600	  նալ	ցած/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	անալ	-նալ+ցած
SFX 600	  նել	րած/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	[ցձ]նել	-նել+րած
SFX 600	  ել	ած/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	[^չն]ել			-ել+ած
SFX 600	  իլ	ած/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	[^չն]իլ			-իլ+ած
SFX 600	  ալ	ացած/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	[^ն]ալ	-ալ+ացած

SFX 601 Y 5
SFX 601	  նել	ուցած/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	[ցձ]նել	-նել+ուցած
SFX 601	  ընել	ուցած/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	ընել		-ընել+ուցած
SFX 601	  անել	ած/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	ուցանել		-անել+ած
SFX 601	  ել	ած/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	չել				-ել+ած
SFX 601	  ալ	ացած/4,5,10,12,14,17,41,43,82,84,89,90,91,92,93,94,95,96,97,98,99,100,101,102,103,104,105,106	ալ		-ալ+ացած
